Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-210
Attorney General; actions against members of Legislature; defense when Attorney General disqualified.

When the nature of the action referred to in section 84-209 is such that the Attorney General is disqualified by law from appearing therein and defending the same, then, in that event, it shall be the duty of the Governor of the state to appoint special counsel to appear and defend such action in like manner as the Attorney General might do, if qualified.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 9, § 2, p. 68;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 84-212;

R.S.1943, § 84-210.